North Carolina, session 2025, SB1013.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) G.S. 147-64.6 reads as rewritten:
"§ 147-64.6. Duties and responsibilities.
…
(c) Responsibilities. – The Auditor is responsible for the following acts and activities:
…
(3) The Auditor, on the Auditor's own initiative and as often as the Auditor deems
necessary, or as requested by the Governor or the General Assembly, shall, to
the extent deemed practicable and consistent with the Auditor's overall
responsibility as contained in this Article, make or cause to be made audits of
all or any part of the activities of the State agencies. Each State agency
receiving a financial statement audit by the Auditor under this subdivision
subsection shall prepare a and submit financial statement statements and
supplementary information in the format required by the Auditor. Financial
statements and supplementary information prepared as required by this
subdivision shall be completed and submitted to the Auditor not later than 60
days after the deadline for the State agency's Annual Comprehensive Annual
Financial Report submission as established by the State Controller.
…
(5) The Auditor may contract with federal audit agencies, or any governmental
agency, on a cost reimbursable basis, for the Auditor to perform audits of
federal grants and programs administered by State agencies in accordance
with agreements negotiated between the Auditor and the contracting federal
audit agencies or any governmental agency. In instances where the grantee
State agency subgrants these federal funds to local governments, regional
councils of government, and other local groups or private or semiprivate
institutions or agencies, the Auditor may examine the books and records of
these subgrantees to the extent necessary to determine eligibility and proper
use in accordance with State and federal laws.
The Auditor shall charge and collect from the contracting federal audit
agencies, or any governmental agencies, the actual cost of all the audits of the
grants and programs contracted by the Auditor to do. Amounts collected under
these arrangements shall be deposited in the State Treasury and be budgeted
in the Department of State Auditor and shall be available to hire sufficient
*S1013-v-2*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
personnel to perform these contracted audits and to pay for related travel,
supplies, and other necessary expenses.
…
(11) The Auditor shall, through appropriate tests, satisfy himself or herself
concerning the propriety of the data presented in the Annual Comprehensive
Annual Financial Report and shall express the appropriate auditor's an audit
opinion of it in accordance with generally accepted auditing standards.
…
(13) At the conclusion of an audit, the Auditor or the Auditor's designated
representative shall discuss the audit with the official whose office is subject
to audit and submit necessary underlying facts developed for all findings and
recommendations that may be included in the audit report. On audits of
economy and efficiency and program results, the auditee's written response
shall be included in the final report if received within 15 to 30 days from
receipt of the draft report. The length of time shall be determined by the
Auditor and shall be commensurate with the number and complexity of the
findings.
…
(25) The Auditor may elect to be exempted from oversight by the Department of
Administration on the matters of purchasing, contracts, acquisition and
maintenance of real property, and leasing of office space under
G.S. 143-341(2), (4)d. and d1., and (8)d. and Article 6 of Chapter 146 of the
General Statutes. This election shall be made in writing by the Auditor and
shall be sent to the Secretary of Administration.
(26) The Auditor may enter into an agreement with the Conference of District
Attorneys to assign resource prosecutors under G.S. 7A-415 to matters
referred by the Auditor to district attorneys. A resource prosecutor working
under this agreement may do all of the following:
a. Handle financial crimes and any criminal matters that result from an
investigation conducted by the Auditor.
b. Assist the Auditor and Auditor's staff in criminal matters.
c. At the request of a district attorney, prosecute criminal matters that
result from an investigation by the Auditor.
d. Perform other duties assigned by the Executive Director of the
Conference of District Attorneys.
(27) The Auditor may enter into agreements under G.S. 147-64.7(b) for
subject-matter expertise and assistance in auditing Medicaid providers, as
defined in G.S. 108C-2. Any contingent fees paid to contractors that enter into
agreements with the Auditor under this subdivision shall be calculated in the
same manner and subject to the same procedural requirements as payments
made under G.S. 108C-5.1 and shall be paid from the final overpayment, as
defined in G.S. 108C-2, when the overpayment was identified and referred to
the Department of Health and Human Services by the Auditor's respective
contractors. The Auditor and any contractors that enter into agreements under
this subdivision shall work with the Department of Health and Human
Services with respect to potential adverse determinations, as defined in
G.S. 108C-2, and refer any matter to the appropriate law enforcement entities
in accordance with G.S. 147-64.6B.
The Auditor and any contractors that enter into agreements with the
Auditor under this subdivision are not acting under the Medicaid Recovery
Audit Contractors Program set forth in 42 U.S.C. § 1396a(a)(42) and 42
Page 2 Senate Bill 1013-Second Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
C.F.R. Part 455, Subpart F. Nothing in this subdivision limits the authority of
the Department of Health and Human Services as the single State agency
designated under 42 C.F.R. § 431.10.
…
(f) Costs of Audits. – The Auditor shall charge and collect from contracting federal audit
agencies, or any governmental agencies, the actual cost of all audits of the grants and programs
contracted by the Auditor to do pursuant to subdivision (5) of subsection (c) of this section. The
Auditor may charge and collect from each State agency the actual cost of the financial statement
audits completed pursuant to subdivision (3) of subsection (c) of this section and the actual cost
of audits of the financial information and workbooks prepared by State agencies for submission
into the Annual Comprehensive Financial Report when the audits support the Auditor's opinion
of the Annual Comprehensive Financial Report. The Auditor shall not charge or collect from the
Office of the State Controller any costs associated with auditing the Annual Comprehensive
Financial Report. Amounts collected under this subsection shall be deposited with the
Department of State Treasurer and shall be budgeted for the Department of State Auditor. The
Department of State Auditor may use these funds to hire sufficient personnel to perform these
contracted audits and to pay for related travel, supplies, and other necessary expenses."
SECTION 1.(b) G.S. 147-64.7(b)(2) reads as rewritten:
"(2) No State agency may shall enter into any a contract for auditing services which
that may impact on the State's comprehensive annual financial report Annual
Comprehensive Financial Report without consultation with, and the prior
written approval of, the Auditor, except in instances where audits are called
for by the Governor under G.S. 143C-2-1 and he shall so notify the Auditor.
The Auditor shall prescribe policy and establish guidelines containing
appropriate criteria for selection and use of independent public accountants,
qualified management consultants, or other professional persons by State
agencies and governing bodies to perform all or part of the audit function."
SECTION 1.(c) This section becomes effective October 1, 2026.
SECTION 2.(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Auditor may
change existing appropriated positions and benefits responsible for performing financial
statement audits to receipt-supported positions and benefits. These appropriated funds shall not
revert to the General Fund.
SECTION 2.(b) This section becomes effective July 1, 2026.
SECTION 3. G.S. 143B-1208.3 reads as rewritten:
"§ 143B-1208.3. General powers and duties of Director and law enforcement officers of the
State Bureau of Investigation.
The Director of the Bureau and other sworn law enforcement officers of the State Bureau of
Investigation are given the same power of arrest as is now vested in the sheriffs of the several
counties, and their jurisdiction shall be statewide. The Director of the Bureau and other sworn
law enforcement officers of the Bureau may give assistance to sheriffs, police officers, district
attorneys, and judges judges, and the State Auditor when called upon by them and so directed.
They shall also give assistance, when requested, to the Department of Public Safety in the
investigation of cases pending before the parole office and of complaints lodged against parolees,
when so directed by the Governor."
SECTION 4.(a) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Auditor the sum of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) in recurring funds for the
2026-2027 fiscal year to be used by the Office of State Auditor to pay for the cost of auditing the
Annual Comprehensive Financial Report.
SECTION 4.(b) This section becomes effective July 1, 2026.
SECTION 5. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
Senate Bill 1013-Second Edition Page 3